Hawaii statutes.
§8-12 World Ocean Day. June 8 of each
year shall be known and recognized as "World Ocean Day" to celebrate
and honor the oceans of the world, improve international relations, and
increase public awareness of conservation management of the ocean environment;
provided that this day is not and shall not be construed to be a state
holiday. All citizens shall be encouraged to observe and celebrate the
blessings of the oceans and endeavor to become caretakers of the ocean for
future generations. [L 1998, c 21, §2; am L 2009, c 2, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next